Washington statutes.
RCW 39.46.060

Bonds—Reproduction of physical instrument.

Where bonds are issued by the state or a local government as physical instruments, the bonds shall be printed, engraved, lithographed, typed, or reproduced and the manual or facsimile signatures of both a designated officer and chairperson of the governing body or chief executive shall be included on each bond.

[ 1983 c 167 s 6.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.